dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- żibġa; żib; 2 -->
    <pardef n="żib/ġa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ġa</l>
          <r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>ġa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċangun; ċ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/angun__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>angun</l>
          <r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nagan</l>
          <r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nagen</l>
          <r>angun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- skarpell; sk; 3 -->
    <pardef n="sk/arpell__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arpell</l>
          <r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rapel</l>
          <r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riepel</l>
          <r>arpell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fellus; f; 2 -->
    <pardef n="f/ellus__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ellus</l>
          <r>ellus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lieles</l>
          <r>ellus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- maktur; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/aktur__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aktur</l>
          <r>aktur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>katar</l>
          <r>aktur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- abjad; ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="/abjad__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abjad</l>
          <r>abjad<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bojod</l>
          <r>abjad<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- borqom; b; 3 -->
    <pardef n="b/orqom__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orqom</l>
          <r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieqam</l>
          <r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieqem</l>
          <r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mgħarfa; mgħar; 2 -->
    <pardef n="mgħar/fa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fa</l>
          <r>fa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ef</l>
          <r>fa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għerq; għer; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għer/q__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>q</l>
          <r>q<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uq</l>
          <r>q<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- toqba; toq; 2 -->
    <pardef n="toq/ba__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ba</l>
          <r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ob</l>
          <r>ba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- martell; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/artell__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>artell</l>
          <r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rietel</l>
          <r>artell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħanek; ħ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="ħ/anek__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anek</l>
          <r>anek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niek</l>
          <r>anek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nieki</l>
          <r>anek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- knisja; kn; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kn/isja__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isja</l>
          <r>isja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjes</l>
          <r>isja<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġakketta; ġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġ/akketta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>akketta</l>
          <r>akketta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kieket</l>
          <r>akketta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tajra; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/ajra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajra</l>
          <r>ajra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jur</l>
          <r>ajra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġummiena; ġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġ/ummiena__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ummiena</l>
          <r>ummiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>miemen</l>
          <r>ummiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- burqax; b; 4 -->
    <pardef n="b/urqax__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urqax</l>
          <r>urqax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raqax</l>
          <r>urqax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieqax</l>
          <r>urqax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieqex</l>
          <r>urqax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- moħħ; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/oħħ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oħħ</l>
          <r>oħħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ħuħ</l>
          <r>oħħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċappetta; ċ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/appetta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>appetta</l>
          <r>appetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>piepet</l>
          <r>appetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċoqqa; ċoq; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċoq/qa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qa</l>
          <r>qa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oq</l>
          <r>qa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċerna; ċer; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċer/na__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kelb; k; 2 -->
    <pardef n="k/elb__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elb</l>
          <r>elb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lieb</l>
          <r>elb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="żibġa"><i>żib</i><par n="żib/ġa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċangun"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/angun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skarpell"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/arpell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fellus"><i>f</i><par n="f/ellus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maktur"><i>m</i><par n="m/aktur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="abjad"><i></i><par n="/abjad__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="borqom"><i>b</i><par n="b/orqom__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mgħarfa"><i>mgħar</i><par n="mgħar/fa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għerq"><i>għer</i><par n="għer/q__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="toqba"><i>toq</i><par n="toq/ba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="martell"><i>m</i><par n="m/artell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħanek"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/anek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="knisja"><i>kn</i><par n="kn/isja__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġakketta"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/akketta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tajra"><i>t</i><par n="t/ajra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġummiena"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ummiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="burqax"><i>b</i><par n="b/urqax__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="moħħ"><i>m</i><par n="m/oħħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċappetta"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/appetta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċoqqa"><i>ċoq</i><par n="ċoq/qa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċerna"><i>ċer</i><par n="ċer/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kelb"><i>k</i><par n="k/elb__n_GD"/></e>
